West Virginia, session 2025, HB2309.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Occupational Therapy. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on January 10, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-28-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Occupational Therapy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 29, 2024, relating to the Board of Occupational Therapy (consideration of prior criminal convictions in initial licensure determinations, 13 CSR 08), is authorized.